Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1004
Sale at auction by carrier; when act inapplicable.

The provisions of sections 69-1001 to 69-1005 shall not apply to baby chicks in the custody of a common carrier upon which the freight has been prepaid, and which must be sold at public auction because delivery thereof cannot be effected beyond the control of such common carrier.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 4, p. 1280.